






























MergedFile




 

First Internet Broadband Marketplace 

powered by P2P VPN Network on Blockchain 
 

 

 

WHITE PAPER 

 

 

 

 

Authors 

Dima Rusakov,  Andrei Tseitlin,  Dmitriy Rubtsov, Nikita Kuznetsov 

 

 

March 2018 

Release 5.0 - English 

 

 

 

Abstract 

 

This white paper presents the Privatix concept of a decentralized autonomous P2P VPN network              
on blockchain with its own crypto-economy which will serve as the first bandwidth exchange              
marketplace. Based on the blockchain technology, the network will contain thousands or even             
millions of exit nodes around the world and will provide an innovative new way for developers                
to build products that will potentially disrupt several markets, like the consumer VPN industry,              
cyber protection, CDN, business intelligence and even software and mobile apps monetization.  

 

 



 

Contents 
1. Introduction 4 

1.1 Major problems facing the internet 4 
1.2 The current centralized solution 5 
1.3 New opportunities 6 
1.4 Our mission and goals 6 

2. Token PRIX 7 
2.1 Specifications 7 
2.2 The crypto-economy 9 
2.3 Examples of use 10 

3. Token sale 12 
3.1 Privatix Token (PRIX) final distribution details 12 

4. Business model 12 
4.1 Privatix Network 13 
4.2 Proof of Concept (PoC) products 13 
4.3 Long-term strategy 14 

5. Technical specifications 15 

5. 1 General 15 
Privatix network users 15 
Concept 15 

5.2 Basic usage scenario 16 

5.3 Prerequisites 16 

5.4 Smart contract operations 16 
State channel performance 17 
Smart contract upgrade 18 
Service supply 18 
Sybil attack mitigation 18 

Malicious Agent 18 
Malicious Client 19 
Reputation 20 
Summary 20 

5.5 Service offering flow description 20 
Service discovery and setup overview 20 
Service offering messaging description 21 
Publish Service Offering 22 

1 



 

Prepare Service offering 22 
Service offering template 23 
Service Offering message 25 
Service offering hash generation 25 
Service offering signature generation 26 
Service offering verification 26 

Blockchain usage 26 
Offering Messaging Channel usage 26 

Discover service offering 27 
Blockchain usage 27 
Offering Messaging Channel usage 27 
Choosing Service Offering 27 

Check for available supply 28 
Deposit and authentication message 28 

Prepare authentication message 28 
Authentication message template 28 
Authentication message hash generation 29 
Authentication message signature generation 30 

Blockchain usage 30 
Offering Messaging Channel usage 30 

New subscriptions discovery and account setup 30 
Blockchain usage 30 
Offering Messaging Channel usage 30 
Account setup 30 

Service Endpoint discovery 32 
Endpoint message template 32 
Blockchain usage 33 
Offering Messaging Channel usage 33 

5.6 Service controller functional scheme 33 

5.7 Service controller protocol  scheme 34 

5.8 Glossary 35 

6. Markets overview 39 
6.1 Global VPN market 39 
6.2 Cyber security and privacy protection 41 
6.3 CDN 42 
6.4  Business intelligence and data collecting (Proxy / Socks gateways) 45 
6.5 Mobile apps and software monetization 48 

2 



 

7. Products and services – Proof of Concept 51 
7.1 Privatix.Agent - cross-platform software for exit nodes owners 51 
7.2 Consumer VPN based on DPI-free VPN protocol 53 
7.3 Privatix.BOX - portable VPN router 55 
7.4 Advanced Proxy / Socks selling API platform 56 
7.5 Infrastructure for VPN providers 57 
7.6 Decentralized CDN on blockchain 58 
7.7 Privatix.FAAS - anti-censorship solution for developers 59 
7.8 Privatix.Monetize - mobile apps and software monetization platform 59 

8. The Privatix team 60 
8.1 Our last projects track record 60 
8.3 Our “Unfair Advantage” 61 

9.  Roadmap 62 
9.1 First steps after Token Sale 62 

9.1.1 First month priorities 62 
9.1.2 Legal, HR and administrative issues 62 

9.2 Q4 / 2017 - Q2 / 2018 : Privatix Network Core Development 63 
9.2.1 Privatix Network - Alpha 63 
9.2.2 Privatix.Agent - cross-platform software for exit nodes owners 63 

9.3 Q3 - Q4 / 2018 : Proof of Concept (PoC) products and Network 63 
9.3.1 Consumer VPN, based on DPI-free VPN protocol 64 
9.3.2  Advanced Proxy / Socks selling API platform 64 
9.3.3 Privatix Network - Beta release 64 

9.4 Q1 - Q2 / 2019 : Additional Proof of Concept (PoC) products and Network 64 
9.4.1 Privatix Network - Final release 65 
9.4.2 Privatix.FAAS (SDK) 65 
9.4.3 Privatix.Monetize (SDK) 65 

9.5 Q3 - Q4 / 2019 : Proof of Concept (PoC) products and Network 65 
9.5.1 Privatix.BOX (Hardware) 66 
9.5.2 Infrastructure for VPN providers 66 

10. Additional information 66 
10.1 Legal protection framework for exit nodes owners 66 
10.2 Solution for mass adoption problem 67 
10.3 Commitment to open source community 68 
10.4 Legal disclaimers 68 
10.5 RISK FACTORS 69 

 

3 



 

1. Introduction 
 

Privatix is an established and profitable company that was founded by a group of experienced IT                

entrepreneurs and talented developers who are passionate about the freedom of the internet,             

online security, and the rights of individuals and businesses to privacy protection. 

 

Our team - which has more than 10 years’ cyber security experience - are the developers of an                  

incredibly easy-to-use, free VPN service - at ​Privatix.com - that can be used by anyone               

anywhere, regardless of their level of technical experience. Since 2015, more than 1,250,000             

users have used this service.  

 

Privatix is also the team behind ​Temp-Mail.org​. It has more than 200,000 daily visitors and               

filters out more than 10 million spam emails a day. 

 

Privatix has developed the advanced internet identity checking website Ipleak.com, and many            

other privacy-related services.  

 

Now we have created a concept of a decentralized, fully autonomous network on blockchain.              

The Privatix Network is designed to have its own advanced crypto-economy and allow the users               

to rent out their broadband. We believe it has the potential to end the current era of internet                  

censorship and totally change the current VPN market, among others (e.g. cyber security).  

 

1.1 Major problems facing the internet 

 

The incredible worldwide growth of internet users is astounding. In 2016 we had 3.4 billion               

users, representing 46% of the world’s population. By 2020, it is predicted that we will see 5                 

billion users online.  

 

4 

https://privatix.com/
https://temp-mail.org/


 

But, as the number of users online grows, so does the level of internet censorship. In the future,                  

most new users will likely come from countries with increasingly strict internet censorship laws;              

because these users often have poor internet mobile connections, they are the most vulnerable to               

these sometimes draconian and arbitrary laws. It is these users who are seeking effective              

solutions to internet restrictions. 

 

Today, one of the major problems with the internet is the denial of the network neutrality                

paradigm, that suggests an equal opportunity for everyone to access the world wide web.  

 

This denial will lead to the collapse of the internet as we have known it over the last 25 years.                    

Users are not just being watched by overzealous governments and cybercriminals, their data is              

collected by ISPs and their basic privacy rights are routinely violated. This is happening not just                

in countries like China or Iran, but in Australia, Germany, and even the U.S.  

 

The second problem is the cybersecurity issue. According to Cybersecurity Ventures report, we             

have more than $3B in losses from cybersecurity incidents online in 2015 and it is expected to                 

grow to $6B in 2021. The complexity of technical solutions today means that robust encryption               

algorithms aren’t always accessible to ordinary people to effectively protect their data and ensure              

cybersecurity easily and affordably.  

 

The third problem is speed. While the internet is global, network quality is not equal in all                 

countries. Content is getting heavier all the time, e.g. full HD videos, streaming movies, etc.  

 

1.2 The current centralized solution 

 

Solutions for the internet censorship problem are currently available on the market. However,             

they come with a high price tag and are still vulnerable to ISPs control. It’s not a secret that the                    

VPN industry is growing fast, not least of all because of the lure of the industry’s huge profit                  

margins. As an insider, Privatix is aware of some of the major problems in the centralized VPN                 

5 



 

arena, including false statements about log-keeping policies, data selling, overcharging, unclear           

billing policies, and the incredible margins that are siphoned off into marketing, advertising, etc.  

 

In fact, the VPN industry doesn’t protect users’ privacy and data while the users pay a high price                  

for VPN services only because there are no better options on the market. 

 

1.3 New opportunities 

 

With its huge potential to be one of the most powerful forces in the internet technologies sphere,                 

blockchain will enable us to turn current internet privacy and security practices on its head,               

simultaneously speeding up the internet (without any physical scaling.)  

 

Privatix Network is a conceptual new solution that will benefit ordinary internet users,             

developers, and online businesses. We intend to reduce costs and margins on the VPN consumer               

market, eliminate the middleman and enable people to share (and profit from sharing) their spare               

broadband connection. We will provide a new horizon for developers to build awesome apps and               

services on the basis of this network, e.g. CDN, business intelligence proxy tools, anti-censorship              

SDKs for apps, etc. The wealth of potential applications is only limited by imagination.  

 

1.4 Our mission and goals 

 

Our mission is ​to create a decentralized and fully autonomous P2P VPN Network on blockchain               

with advanced Internet bandwidth marketplace powered by its own crypto-economy.  

 

Our goal is to show a possibility to create new kinds of products and services based on the                  

Network capabilities which have the potential to transform a number of markets like VPN, CDN,               

cyber security and encryption or may even change the landscape of application monetization             

market.  

 

6 



 

2. Token PRIX 
 

The Privatix Network ecosystem will be based on crypto-economic principles. PRIX will be the              

only crypto-currency allowed for mutual settlements during the buying / selling interactions            

between network participants.  

 

2.1 Specifications 

 

PRIX​, an ​ERC20 token on the Ethereum Blockchain, is the central part of the Privatix Network.                

It’s main purpose is to allow network participants to exchange value.  

 
 

Token name Privatix Token 

Ticker PRIX 

Type ERC20 ( Ethereum ) 

Address 0x3adfc4999f77d04c8341bac5f3a76f58dff5b37a 

Decimals  8 

Total supply (after burning) 1,275,455 PRIX (fixed, no dilution) 

Mining No mining or any other means of increasing token amounts will 
apply to Privatix Token  

Token utility Internal crypto-currency to exchange value (utility) between 
Privatix Network participants 

Token issuer Privatix Token Ltd (a Gibraltar limited company)  

Token special conditions Token exchanges for purpose of buying / selling internet         
broadband (between Privatix Network participants only) will be        
subject to commission fee - up to 1% of transaction price in            
PRIX. No fees for any other transactions and exchanges except          
payments for bandwidth.  

 
 

7 

https://etherscan.io/token/0x3adfc4999f77d04c8341bac5f3a76f58dff5b37a


 

2.2 The crypto-economy 

 

The main economic agents inside the crypto-economy of the Privatix Network are: 

● Users who want to sell their internet bandwidth (Agents) 

● Users who want to buy internet bandwidth from Agents (Clients) 

 

 

 

PRIX will be the only crypto-currency allowed for mutual settlements. At the same time, the               

PRIX token itself is expected to be traded on external exchanges. Assuming there is sufficient               

market volume, PRIX shall be be freely exchangeable for other cryptocurrencies in both             

directions and anytime, subject to applicable regulations and/or restrictions in the various            

jurisdictions.  

 

PRIX is not intended to be a digital currency, security, commodity, bond, debt instrument or any                

kind of financial instrument or investment carrying equivalent rights, nor are the PRIX tokens              

intended to represent any form of money or legal tender in any jurisdiction, nor any               

8 



 

representation of money (including electronic money). Accordingly, any protections offered by           

applicable law in relation to the purchase, holding and/or sale of the instruments and/or              

investments referred to above and generally known as “securities”, should not apply to your              

holding or sale of PRIX tokens. PRIX tokens are intended to be digital goods, similar to                

downloadable software, digital music, and etc.  

 

In basic economic terms, on the demand side there are Clients and on the supply side there are                  

Agents. Clients want to buy broadband from Agents, and Agents, accordingly, want to sell it. So,                

at the market equilibrium point, the price of internet broadband will be represented in PRIX               

tokens (for example, 1 MB = 0.001 PRIX).  

 

In the event of an excessive demand for Agents' broadband, the PRIX token is going to increase                 

in price, thereby likely to attract more Agents to the network (as they will see they can sell their                   

broadband for a higher price) and vice versa. 

 

Demand and supply will be self-regulated effectively by market forces; attracted in the case of               

high traffic costs by Agents craving profit, and in the case of low traffic cost by Clients wishing                  

to buy broadband as cheaply as possible. 

 

2.3 Examples of use  

 

Here are two very simple examples which demonstrate PRIX tokens payments inside the Privatix              

Network ecosystem. 

 

Example 1 

● Hans, a regular internet user from Germany, has a 100 Mbps channel and he does not use                 

it completely, especially at night. 

● He has already paid his ISP so no additional costs are required. 

● Hans installs the Privatix Network software and thereby becomes an Agent. 

9 



 

● On the other side of the world is a Chinese internet user, Lee. 

● Lee does not have access to many internet sites because internet censorship in China is               

very strict. 

● Lee installs a VPN program based on the Privatix Network and through it buys              

broadband from Hans. Now he can surf the internet via the encrypted German VPN and               

get access to all internet sites. 

● Hans receives payment in PRIX as Lee uses  his free bandwidth. 

 

 

Example 2 

● Alex has an internet hosting business. He rents 10 dedicated servers and sells hosting              

services for his customers, e.g. site owners. 

● All servers are already paid for but their bandwidth is significantly underused. 

● Alex installs the Privatix Network Agent software on all his servers and starts selling his               

bandwidth.  

● Another user, Ivan, the owner of a video site, has to rent expensive servers so that people                 

can watch HD video content from around the world. 

● Ivan, in order to save on data transfer, uses a product based on the Privatix Network - a                  

CDN - which allows him to buy cheap broadband from hundreds of Agents like Alex. 

● As a result, Alex fully loads his servers and receives profit while Ivan cuts content               

delivery costs. 

 

  

10 



 

3. Token sale  
The Privatix Token Sale opened on 19 October 2017 and ended at 16 November 2017. During                

those 30 days we collected: 5,775 ETH (7,183 ETH in total with 1,408 ETH of Pre-sale).  

 

3.1 Privatix Token (PRIX) final distribution details 

 

100% Total supply: 1,275,455 

83% Token Sale and Pre-sale: 1,058,627 

7% Founders (locked for 12m): 89,281 

7% Future and current team: 89,281 

3% Advisors, bounty, and cost covering: 38,263 

Total circulation supply: 1,058,627 (7% of locked 12m tokens excluded) 

Total contributors: 1,435 

 

All unsold tokens were burned, and no future tokens can be issued. 

The exact total supply is 1,275,455.31177803 PRIX 

Token address: 0x3adfc4999f77d04c8341bac5f3a76f58dff5b37a 

 

 

4. Business model  
 

The main assets in the Privatix Network are “exit nodes owners” (Agents). These Agents host on                

their internet-connected devices special lightweight software which enables them to sell their            

internet bandwidth.  

  

Most internet-connected users have a lot of spare bandwidth that already has been paid for to an                 

ISP but mostly remain unused.  

11 



 

 

Privatix will enable the sale of this unused asset (bandwidth) to other network participants and               

strives to create meaningful value for Agents with no additional costs or any initial investment               

from their side (installing the free software is quick and easy).  

 

All financial relationships between Agents and Clients will be in PRIX crypto-currency only.             

Every token exchange linked to payment for internet broadband will be subject to a fee that will                 

be accumulated by Privatix for maintenance and future development. The fee will be in the range                

up to 1% of the transaction amount. All operations except payments for internet bandwidth, like               

token trades on exchanges, will be free from any fees.  

 

4.1 Privatix Network 

 

 

 

 

 

4.2 Proof of Concept (PoC) products  

12 



 

 

Our mission is to create a decentralized and fully autonomous network on blockchain - the               

Privatix Network – but, hand in hand with this, one of our primary goals is to show how people                   

can make the best use of this network and benefit from it in many different ways, including                 

financially.  

 

For this reason, we ourselves will create a number of revolutionary PoC products, based on the                

Privatix Network, in order to demonstrate to entrepreneurs and developers how they can use this               

new platform in a number of innovative ways. Privatix, as platform pioneer, also has the               

potential to derive significant profits from these products by transforming several popular VPN             

and other markets (e.g. cyber security).  

 

The first product we will focus on will be a decentralized unblockable VPN on blockchain that                

we believe will address the challenges facing cybersecurity and internet censorship in the digital              

sphere forever. We expect to totally change the consumer VPN market, enabling people to use               

VPN for free by sharing their own network, or pay less than $5-10 per year (10-20 times less                  

than current centralized VPN prices).  

 

4.3 Long-term strategy  

 

We define the long-term strategy as a plan for the next three years. In the current real-world                 

situation of internet disruption and blockchain technologies development, it is a challenge to             

create a fully detailed plan, but by sticking to our mission and goals, and relying on our extensive                  

experience, we are completely confident that we will find the right way in any situation. 

 

Facilitation of a Privatix Network platform, provision of network supply in the form of Agents,               

as well as the creation of demand in the form of Clients are our main objectives for the                  

immediate future. 

 

13 



 

The challenge we face will be to facilitate a balanced marketplace: we will address this by                

providing adequate compensation to Agents and at the same time create demand by customers.              

Initially, we will take on the roles of customers and PoC products’ owners. We will use our                 

funds to promote the network and ensure its growth and maintain the optimum balance between               

supply and demand. 

 

At this time we predict the network will include tens of thousands or even millions of Agents. By                  

developing a variety of products based on its foundations, the network will start taking on a life                 

of its own. Privatix will benefit only from the network token exchanges fee and will develop the                 

infrastructure of the network and products. 

 

5. Technical specifications 
 

Specify high-level solution description for Privatix.io services. This document describe high           

level architectural and process overview of Privatix.io service. 

5. 1 General 
Privatix.io attempts to deliver multiple services that can be used through Privatix network. First              

of them is decentralized VPN service on Ethereum blockchain. This paper will focus on VPN               

service. Before we will dig in to details, of how Privatix services will operate, we need to                 

mention some basic concepts.  

Privatix network users 

Clients - those who consume and pay for services. 

Agents - those who provide services and receive payment. 

Concept 

14 

http://privatix.io/


 

The idea that stands behind this project is to create process that will achieve consensus among                

Privatix network users and develop software products that will allow users to provide and              

consume services on this network. Another important aspect that those processes should be             

decentralized as much as possible, to remove single point of failure both technically and              

politically. Last major goal is to protect privacy of users. 

5.2 Basic usage scenario 
To allow Privatix network users to provide and consume services they need to: 

● Create service offering 

● Find service offering, compare and accept it 

● Be sure that they can pay and get paid 

● Negotiate on authentication and find service endpoint 

● Provide and consume service 

● Pay and get paid in small portions 

Below we will describe each process, including some technical description.  

5.3 Prerequisites 
We assume that each network user has: 

1. Internet access 

2. PRIX tokens with corresponding private keys  

3. Agent - have installed Privatix Agent software 

4. Client - have installed Privatix Client software 

5.4 Smart contract operations 
Ethereum smart contracts playing fundamental role in Privatix DApp architecture. Currently           

deployed smart contract that holds all PRIX tokens called Privatix Token Contact (hereinafter             

PTC) and compliant with ERC20 standard.  

15 



 

PTC will be used for: 

● Token exchange 

● Upgrade to new service contract 

To provide additional logic and features, as well as support future upgrades, Privatix will deploy               

additional smart contract named Privatix Service Contract (hereinafter PSC). PSC contract           

implements state channels features, service offering discovery, helps to negotiate on service            

setup, incentivize fair usage and controls supply visibility. Token exchange between Ethereum            

accounts is done using standard ERC20 transfer mechanism. PTC balances will be used to buy               

and sell PRIX only, rather than pay for services. To use Privatix services PRIX tokens will be                 

approved for transfer to PSC contract address effectively delegating all operations to PSC             

contract.  

PSC will be used for: 

● Local balance storage 

● Agent SO registration and deposit placement 

● Agent SO deactivation and deposit return 

● Retrieving available supply for SO 

● Pop up SO 

● Creating state channel 

● Cooperative close of channel 

● Uncooperative close of channel 

● Top up deposit of state channel 

State channel performance 

To save Ethereum gas and decrease time, which is required to setup state channel, PSC will                

maintain its own balance mapping. This mapping will hold mapping of PRIX to user's balances               

until user will decide to move PRIX balance back to PTC. For that purpose, PSC will have                 

mechanism to return back tokens from PSC to user's Ethereum address in PTC. Making PSC               

operations rely on internal balances greatly improves security by preventing external contracts to             

execute arbitrary code thus mitigating reentrancy attacks. 

16 



 

Smart contract upgrade 

To support future upgrade of PSC logic and features, while giving users ability to control and                

audit such changes, following upgrade path is planned. Privatix Company may publish new             

version of PSC (e.g. version 2.0) in future. Users would verify smart contract code and if agreed,                 

that it is safe to use, will firstly transfer their PRIX tokens from PSC v1.0 back to PTC and only                    

then to PSC v2.0. Such approach leaves no backdoors even for Privatix employees and gives               

anybody ability to review new smart contract code before they switch to it. Privatix company               

may implement PSC.upgrade() function, which can be executed only by Privatix company. This             

function will prevent incoming transactions from PTC to PSC, but will still allow transfer of               

balances back to PTC. This method can be used as notification of smart contract upgrade to users                 

UI, as well as pushes users to perform upgrade. 

Service supply 

Service supply is maximum number of concurrent Clients that Agent can serve with same SO               

parameters. When Agent registers his offering in PSC, he will specify service supply. Publishing              

service supply will allow Clients to find out, if Agent still has available supply to serve the Client                  

according to published SO. Before state channel is created, PSC will check, if available supply               

still exists and keep demand and supply balanced. After state channel was created PSC will emit                

event with actual service supply, making possible for all users to filter out offerings with zero                

supply. If state channel is closed, service supply will be increased and users notified. 

Sybil attack mitigation 

Sybil attacks mitigation in decentralized networks, where at least some degree of anonymity             

expected is not obvious. We are not informed on any bulletproof technology to mitigate Sybil               

attack completely and without introducing some entrance threshold. Most used techniques today            

are proof of work, proof of stake, one-time fee, IPv4 address binding. 

Malicious Agent 

17 



 

To maintain network health and incentivize fair usage, we will require Agents to register their               

service offering in Ethereum blockchain and place deposit. This deposit can be returned back              

after some challenge period is passed from last operation with this SO. This step should protect                

Privatix network from easily being overwhelmed with junk SO and make Sybil attack less              

efficient. Agent Deposit should be proportional to service supply. If malicious Agent will place              

useless SO, that he never goes to fulfill, he will be required to place exactly same deposit as                  

Client will place to accept this offer. On the other hand as time passes from service offering                 

registration, Clients will more likely to consider that this SO is irrelevant and will not accept this                 

offer. Agent will need to notify Clients from time to time that his offer is still alive by popping                   

up it. When Agent pop-ups his SO, deposit will be locked once more for the same challenge                 

period. As pop-up operation makes it cheaper for Agent to spoil service offerings, Clients will               

make additional consideration before accepting such offer. Long running SO can be easily rated              

by comparing number of cooperative channel closes with uncooperative. If Client created state             

channel, but did not receive any service he will be forced to make uncooperative channel close.                

In that case, blockchain event will be emitted where Agent address is listed. If Client will see                 

that there is too many uncooperative closes compared to cooperative once, he will not create new                

state channel with this agent. This will require malicious Agent to create new Agent address,               

transfer tokens and register new service offering. Such malicious operation is expensive and not              

effective.  

If Agent will try to act both as Agent and Client to increase number of cooperative closes, it will                   

cost him additional transaction fees. Moreover, each time he will act as Client he will reduce                

available supply for his service offering. In this case, he need to occupy at least half of maximum                  

supply to make number of cooperative closes equal to number of uncooperative closes. This              

force him to place x 1.5 deposit than locked by normal Clients and still his reputation is far from                   

being perfect. 

We can summarize that Sybil attack by Agent is limited with Agent token balance, by challenge                

period and burns Ether with transaction cost. 

Malicious Client 

18 



 

To harm Agent's reputation malicious Client can create state channel and will not send balance               

proofs to Agent. When creating channel, Client is required to place deposit, which is locked for                

challenge period. To return deposit back to his balance he need to close the channel. Both                

operations burns Ether with transaction cost. Agent can also check blockchain event for             

uncooperative closes of channel made Client and rate him accordingly. This limits effectiveness             

of attack. 

Reputation 

Both Client and Agent communication results in cooperative or uncooperative channel close.            

Each time blockchain event is generated which includes address of Client and Agent,             

participating in channel transaction. These events can be used to make decisions about user              

reputation. User can not only count number of cooperative vs uncooperative closes for another              

user, but also go deeper and build reputation based on transactions of observed user's partners.               

For example, if Agent want to decide on Client's reputation he can see that this Client had good                  

transactions with other Agents and then check those Agent's transactions and see their             

transactions, etc.  

Summary 

Even these measures still does not prevent 100% of Sybil attacks; it definitely limits probability               

and effectiveness of them both for Clients and Agents. 

5.5 Service offering flow description 
Before Client and Agent can use Privatix services, they need to by PRIX tokens and transfer                

them to PSC (Privatix Service Contract). 

Service discovery and setup overview 

Before service can be used, Client should: 

● discover service offering 

● agree 

● put deposit 

19 



 

● specify authentication secret (password) 

● get service connection endpoint 

This mechanism is implemented via some sort of messaging between Client and Agent. Medium              

for such communication includes blockchain and offering messaging channel. Offering          

messaging channel is currently implemented as web-service, which allows Clients and Agents to             

publish and retrieve data. Privatix Company will attempt to make a fully decentralized solution              

by removing this single centralized component. 

Service offering messaging description 

Service offering messaging diagram shows sequence of communication between Client and           

Agent through Offering Messaging Channel and Blockchain. This process allows publishing and            

discovering service offering details, securely setup password and securely providing endpoint           

address.  

Operations with blockchain cannot be perfectly sequenced and require multiple checks to ensure             

that state is stored in blockchain with desired degree of probability, which increases             

exponentially with number of mined blocks.  

20 



 

Publish Service Offering 

Prepare Service offering 

21 



 

Each Agent node may be located in different geographical location, has different internet             

bandwidth and has different cost for internet access. For these and others reasons service              

parameters, TCO and as a result, price may be different on the market. We want to give a                  

freedom for each Agent to decide on his pricing and service policy. On the other hand, we want                  

each Client to be able to understand these offerings and be able to compare among them. To                 

achieve this we will define template for service offering, which will include essential service              

parameters. Along with service and billing parameters, service offering (hereinafter SO) contains            

additional fields, which allows to verify integrity of SO, as well as belonging of SO to specific                 

Agent, holding particular private key. Before publishing, SO Agent cryptographically signs and            

then encrypts it with his own private key.  

One of essential SO fields is Agent's public key. It is used to uniquely identify Agent, encrypt                 

messages to Agent and used by Client to send payments to this Agent. Client must always verify                 

that SO belongs to specific Agent by checking SO signature. SO signature verification ensures              

that no fields in SO were altered, including Ethereum address that is used to receive payments                

for the service being consumed. Service offering template may change in future to support              

different services and additional fields. Each template will contain version field that is unique for               

each service. Below you can find service offering template fields for VPN service with their               

descriptions. 

Service offering template 

Field name Field 
type 

Field 
length 

Description Allow 
null 

Example 

template_version   Version of template  1 

agent_public_key   Agent's public key  04a34b99f22c790c4e36b2b3c2c35a36db0  
6226e41c692fc82b8b56ac1c540c5bd5b8d  
ec5235a0fa8722476c7709c02559e3aa73a  
a03918ba2d492eea75abea235 

service_name   Name of service 
(e.g. VPN) 

 VPN 

country   Country of service 
endpoint in ISO 
3166-1 alpha-2 
format. 

 US 

22 



 

service_supply   Maximum supply 
of services 
according to 
service offerings. It 
represents 
maximum number 
of clients that can 
consume this 
service offering 
concurrently. 

 5 

service_unit   MB/Minutes  MB 

unit_price   PRIX that must be 
paid for 
unit_of_service 

 0.0000002 

min_units   Used to calculate 
minimum deposit 
required 

 100 

max_units   Used to specify 
maximum units of 
service that will be 
supplied. Can be 
empty. 

Yes 10000 

billing_interval   Specified in 
unit_of_service. 
Represent, how 
often Client MUST 
provide payment 
approval to Agent. 

 50 

billing_interval_time
_deviation 

  Time in seconds 
that Agent will 
wait for payment 
approval after each 
billing interval, 
before Agent will 
consider payment 
approval was not 
received. 

 10 

free_intervals   Used to give free 
trial, by specifying 
how many intervals 
can be consumed 
without payment 

 2 

23 



 

min_download_mbps   Minimum expected 
download speed 
(Mbps).Can be 
empty. 

Yes 0.2 

min_upload_mbps   Minimum expected 
upload speed 
(Mbps). Can be 
empty. 

Yes 0.5 

protocol   Protocol: TCP or 
UDP 

  

uuid   Random number to 
allow generation of 
identical SO with 
different hash. 
Possibly UUID4 
generated 
according to 
RFC4122. 

 ea864be6-db42-43e2-bffa-aa44ace573f0 

signature   Cryptographic 
signature of SO 
generated using 
Agent's private 
key. 

 1HZwkjkeaoZfTSaJxDw6aKkxp45agDiEzN  
GyjfvdCnYYNVCE0plqKKrnNXkaQrbbPnD  
e2r59jZJSWlicL6YMi/zaH6VhykqBpQWAk  
pHA+4fxyuiAcSzZAUK9A= 

 

Order of fields in SO template is significant. Will conform to JSON schema format              

(​http://json-schema.org​). Service offering signature is generated using Ethereum typed data          

signing (according to ​https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/712​). This signing method includes        

service offering template fields names and types as part of signature, thus strictly binding              

template format with its data. This seems a good practice, especially for integration with UI of                

wallets.  

Service Offering message 

Keccak-256 hash of SO message (aka offering hash) is used to uniquely identify service offering. 

Service offering hash generation 

1. Transform SO template (fields, types and data) to string compliant with Ethereum            

EIP712 

24 

http://json-schema.org/
https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/712


 

2. Sign (1) 

3. Generate keccak-256 hash of (2) 

Service offering signature generation 

1. Transform SO template (fields, types and data) to string compliant with Ethereum            

EIP712 

2. Generate keccak-256 hash of string 

3. Sign hash with private key 

Service offering verification 

1. Transform SO template (fields, types and data) to string compliant with Ethereum            

EIP712 

2. Generate keccak-256 hash from string 

3. Use ECVerify.ecverify(_so_hash, _so_signature) to retrieve Agent's Ethereum address 

4. Get Agent's Ethereum address from Agent's public key, published in SO 

5. Compare retrieved Ethereum address in (3) with address in (4) 

Blockchain usage 

After Agent has prepared Service Offering, Hash of SO is published in blockchain using function 

PSC.registerServiceOffering (bytes32 _offering_hash,uint256 _min_deposit,uint16    

_max_supply) Along with SO hash, minimum deposit and maximum supply is specified ( see              

Smart contract operations). Agent will check that SO has successfully stored in blockchain state              

by checking corresponding event 

PSC.LogServiceOfferingCreated 

Agent will query blockchain desired times to ensure that registered SO is not get to uncle block. 

Offering Messaging Channel usage 

After SO was successfully stored in blockchain, Agent will publish his SO through Offering              

Messaging Channel. He will receive response indicating that message was stored successfully. 

Offering Messaging Channel will accept message only if hash of submitted message is registered              

in blockchain and discoverable using blockchain events:  

25 



 

● LogServiceOfferingCreated  

● LogChannelCreated  

● LogServiceOfferingEndpoint 

Discover service offering 

Blockchain usage 

Client will search for actual offering by retrieving blockchain events in last defined number of               

blocks. This will prevent from old and unmaintained service offerings to be caught by this query                

(see Smart contract operations). 

● LogServiceOfferingCreated 

● LogServiceOfferingPopedUp 

Client may analyze reputation of service offering submitters (Agents) by observing number of             

cooperative and uncooperative closes that corresponds to their Ethereum address. This can be             

achieved by filtering blockchain events by: 

● LogCooperativeChannelClose 

● LogUnCooperativeChannelClose 

Offering Messaging Channel usage 

After filtering unsatisfactory offerings by minimum deposit and reputation, Client will download            

full SO data. Full SO data is retrieved from offering messaging channel (web service) by               

indicating hash of offering. Client will: 

● verify that signature is correct 

● SO is filled correctly and conforms with known SO template scheme 

○ all not null fields are filled 

○ order of fields is correct 

○ data type correct 

○ field length correct  

If SO passed all verifications it will be stored in DB. If some verifications failed, it will be                  

marked as "not well formed" and will be ignored in future. 

26 



 

Choosing Service Offering 

UI of Client allows filtering and ordering of service offerings, getting reputation statistics for              

each agent and therefore giving ability to choose appropriate offering. Client will choose             

manually or automatically suitable offering. 

 

Service Offering UI​ basic view can be seen as following: 

Date 
publis
hed 

Date 
pop
ped 
up 

Agent 
address 

Coun
try 

Price 
(PRIX) 

Unit Min. 
Deposit 
(PRIX) 

Supply 
max/av
ailable 

Billing 
interval 

Free 
trial 

Direct rating 
(Uncooperative/
Cooperative) 

Number 
of 
transacti
ons 

11-De
c-2017 

31-D
ec-2
017 

04a3....a
235 

US 0.0000002 MB 0.00002 10/10 50 MB 100 
MB 

5% 123 

11-De
c-2017 

N/A 43b5....c
273 

IL 0.00015 minu
te 

0.00008 5/1 10 min 20 min N/A 0 

Check for available supply 

Before Client will place deposit he wants to be sure that Agent has available supply and can                 

serve him. To check for free supply Client will query for blockchain events: 

● LogServiceOfferingDeleted 

● LogServiceOfferingSupplyChanged 

LogServiceOfferingDeleted​ can indicate that SO was deactivated and thus no more relevant. 

LogServiceOfferingSupplyChanged​ will indicate number of available service supply. 

If SO still active and has available supply, Client will attempt to place deposit. 

Deposit and authentication message 

Prepare authentication message 

Authentication message is used by Client to deliver password, which is used to authenticate him,               

while using the service. Password is encrypted with Agent's public key found in SO and               

therefore can be decrypted only by Agent. Authentication message hash is keccak-256 hash of              

authentication message. 

27 



 

Authentication message template 

Filed name Field 
type 

Field 
length 

Description Allow 
null 

Example 

template_version   version of template  3 

client_public_key   Client's public key  04a34b99f22c790c4e36b2b3c2c35a36db0  
6226e41c692fc82b8b56ac1c540c5bd5b8d  
ec5235a0fa8722476c7709c02559e3aa73a  
a03918ba2d492eea75abea235 

uuid   Random number to allow 
generation of identical 
authentication with 
different hash. Possibly 
UUID4 generated according 
to RFC4122. 

 ea864be6-db42-43e2-bffa-aa44ace573f0 

password   Password encrypted with 
Agent's public key. Should 
be randomly generated and 
complaint to password 
complexity policy. 

  

signature   Cryptographic signature of 
authentication message 
generated using Client's 
private key. 

 1HZwkjkeaoZfTSaJxDw6aKkxp45agDiEzN  
GyjfvdCnYYNVCE0plqKKrnNXkaQrbbPn
D  
e2r59jZJSWlicL6YMi/zaH6VhykqBpQWAk  
pHA+4fxyuiAcSzZAUK9A= 

Authentication message hash generation 

28 



 

1. Transform  template (fields, types and data) to string compliant with Ethereum EIP712 

2. Sign (1) 

3. Generate keccak-256 hash of (2) 

Authentication message signature generation 

1. Transform SO template (fields, types and data) to string compliant with Ethereum            

EIP712 

2. Generate keccak-256 hash of string 

3. Sign hash with private key 

Blockchain usage 

Client will attempt to create state channel (see Smart contract operations). Along with state              

channel creation, Client will specify authentication message hash. Client will check for            

blockchain event ​LogChannelCreated,​ which will indicate successful creation of state channel. 

Offering Messaging Channel usage 

After state channel was successfully created, Client will publish authentication message to            

offering messaging channel. 

 

New subscriptions discovery and account setup 

Blockchain usage 

Agent will monitor for new subscriptions by continuously monitoring new blockchain event log             

LogChannelCreated. 

Offering Messaging Channel usage 

When Agent get new event ​LogChannelCreated​, he will get authentication message as one of              

event parameters. Agent will retrieve authentication message from offering message channel by            

hash of authentication message. 

Account setup 

Before Agent will setup Clients` account in DB, he will: 

29 



 

● verify signature of authentication message 

● verify that signature corresponds to Clients` public key 

● verify that Clients` Ethereum address (part of state channel) corresponds to Clients`            

public key 

● decrypt password field from authentication message, using Agents` private key 

On successful verification Agent setups account in DB, where 

● username = state channel key 

password =  decrypted Client's password 

 

Secure password storage using encryption at rest is out of scope of this document 

 

  

30 



 

Service Endpoint discovery 

Client needs to know Agents' endpoint address to connect and start using service. To prevent               

third party to get all endpoints addresses easily, Agent will encrypt endpoint data with Clients'               

public key. It will require from Client to create state channel first and publish authentication               

message, which contains Client's public key. Agent will form specific message according to  

Endpoint message template 

Filed name Field 
type 

Field 
length 

Description Allow 
null 

Example 

template_version   Version of 
template 

 2 

dns   Endpoint DNS 
address 

Yes subdomain.domain.com 

ipv4     195.49.100.100 

ipv6    Yes 2001:0db8:85a3:0000:0000:8a2e:0370:7334 

uuid   Random 
number to 
allow 
generation of 
identical 
authentication 
with different 
hash. Possibly 
UUID4 
generated 
according to 
RFC4122. 

 ea864be6-db42-43e2-bffa-aa44ace573f0 

signature   Cryptographic 
signature of 
authentication 
message 
generated 
using Client's 
private key. 

 1HZwkjkeaoZfTSaJxDw6aKkxp45agDiEzN  
GyjfvdCnYYNVCE0plqKKrnNXkaQrbbPnD  
e2r59jZJSWlicL6YMi/zaH6VhykqBpQWAk  
pHA+4fxyuiAcSzZAUK9A= 

 

DNS is preferred type of endpoint address, as there is currently no method to rediscover               

endpoint in case IP address of Agent changes. 

31 



 

Blockchain usage 

Agent will publish endpoint message using smart contract function         

PSC.publishServiceOfferingEndpoint(). ​This function will emit event      

LogServiceOfferingEndpoint. ​Client will listen to this event and will get endpoint hash as             

parameter of event.  

Offering Messaging Channel usage 

Client will retrieve endpoint message from offering messaging channel using its' hash. He will              

check that endpoint message conforms to known scheme and store in DB, if verification is               

passed. Client is ready to start using service.  

5.6 Service controller functional scheme 
 

 

32 



 

5.7 Service controller protocol  scheme 
 

 

  

  

33 



 

5.8 Glossary  
 

General  

  

Privatix Company Privatix ( ​Privatix.io ) company develop software and        
process, which will allow Privatix network users to        
provide and consume services. 

Privatix Network Network that consists of nodes (users) on this network,         
which can sell and buy Privatix Services using PRIX         
tokens 

PRIX Token Token on ethereum blockchain that was created during        
Privatix.io​ Token Sale 

Privatix Service (service) Digital good that is offered by Agent and can be          
consumed by Client on Privatix network 

Marketplace Website maintained by Privatix Company that will       
simplify usage of Privatix Network as well as perform         
some messaging function on early stages of development        
process. All messaging functionality is expected to be        
moved on decentralized channel on latter stage of        
development. 

 

Technical  

  

Agent Participant of Privatix network that wants to sell services. 

Client Participant of Privatix network that wants to buy services. 

Service offering (SO) 
(aka Offering) 

Properly filled and signed Service Offering Template.       
Service offering purpose is Agent's proposal of Privatix        
Service, which describes its parameters and conditions of        
sales for specific service. Service offering format is        
published by Privatix company in form of Service        
Offering Template 

34 

https://privatix.atlassian.net/wiki/display/~dimarusakov
http://privatix.io/
http://privatix.io/


 

Service Offering Template   
(SOT) 

Documented format, that Agents uses to publish their        
Service Offering. Format MUST be known by both Client         
and Agent to successfully agree on Service Offering 

Service Authentication  
Template (SAT) 

Documented format, that Client uses to pass       
authentication data to Agent. Agent will authenticate       
Client, when Client start using service according to data         
specified in this template. Format MUST be known by         
both Client and Agent to successfully perform       
authentication. 

Service Endpoint Template   
(SAT) 

Documented format, that Agent uses to pass Service        
Endpoint Address to Client. Client will connect to        
Service Endpoint using data in this template. Format        
MUST be known by both Client and Agent to         
successfully connect to service. 

Agent Key Cryptographic key pair generated according to appendix       
F. of ​Ethereum Yellow paper​, which is used by Agent to           
encrypt/decrypt and sign messages. 

Client Key Cryptographic key pair generated according to appendix       
F. of ​Ethereum Yellow paper​, which is used by Client to           
encrypt/decrypt and sign messages. 

Agent Ethereum Address Ethereum address of corresponding Agent's Public Key. 

Client Ethereum Address Ethereum address of corresponding Client's Public Key 

Service Offering message (aka    
offering message) 

Filled Service Offering Template.  

Service Authentication message   
(aka authentication message) 

Filled Service Authentication Template. 

Service Endpoint message (aka    
endpoint message) 

Filled Service Endpoint Template. 

Offering message hash Hash of filled Service Offering Tempate using SHA3        
(according to ​Ethereum Yellow paper​). 

Authentication message hash Hash of filled Service Authentication Tempate using       
SHA3 (according to ​Ethereum Yellow paper​). 

35 

https://ethereum.github.io/yellowpaper/paper.pdf
https://ethereum.github.io/yellowpaper/paper.pdf
https://ethereum.github.io/yellowpaper/paper.pdf
https://ethereum.github.io/yellowpaper/paper.pdf


 

Endpoint message hash Hash of filled Service Endpoint Tempate using SHA3        
(according to ​Ethereum Yellow paper​). 

Privatix Token Contract (PTC) Ethereum contract that holds PRIX token that were        
minted during Privatix.io Token Sale. 

Privatix Service Contract (PSC) Ethereum contract that controlls service usage logic and        
payment processing by Agents and Clients. 

Service Deposit Deposit that is placed to Privatix Service Contract by         
Client to prevent double spending and gurantee payment        
to Agent for Privatix Service.  

Service Offering Messaging   
Channel 

Channel that used to publish full Service Offering        
message, Authentication message and Service Endpoint      
message. Used by Agent and Client to exchange        
necessary information that allow Client to start using        
Privatix Service proposed by Agent. 

Service Endpoint Node that provide Privatix Service and operated by        
Agent.  

Service Endpoint Address DNS or IP address of Agent service node, that Client will           
use to receive service. 

Marketplace Web site maintained by Privatix Company that will        
simplify usage of Privatix Network as well as perform         
some messaging function on early stages of development        
process. All messaging functionality is expected to be        
moved on decentralized channel on latter stage of        
development. 

 

Products names 

  

VPN Centralized VPN service , like ​Privatix.com  

dVPN Decentralized VPN service based on Privatix Network ( As         
described in ​privatix whitepaper​ , section 7 )  

dCDN Decentralized CDN based on Privatix Network ( As described in          
privatix whitepaper​ , section 7 )  

36 

https://ethereum.github.io/yellowpaper/paper.pdf
https://privatix.com/
https://privatix.io/#whitepaper
https://privatix.io/#whitepaper


 

dProxyMarket Decentralized Proxy Maket based on Privatix Network ( As         
described in ​privatix whitepaper​ , section 7 )  

Privatix.BOX Hardware device, portable VPN router based on Privatix Network         
( As described in ​privatix whitepaper​ , section 7 )  

Privatix.FAAS Anti-censorship solution for developers (SDK) based on Privatix        
Network ( As described in ​privatix whitepaper​ , section 7 )  

 

 

 

 

  

37 

https://privatix.io/#whitepaper
https://privatix.io/#whitepaper
https://privatix.io/#whitepaper


 

6. Markets overview 
 

Below is a brief overview of the target markets for the Privatix Network and possible products                

that can be made by using the network capabilities of buying / selling internet bandwidth.  

 

6.1 Global VPN market 

 

There was an estimate of 3.5 billion internet users worldwide in 2016. This means that about 45                 

percent of the global population accessed the internet that year. The majority of global internet               

users are located in East and South Asia, while China is the largest online market in the world.  

 

In 2016, China had over 721 million internet users, more than double the amount of third-ranked                

U.S., with nearly 290 million internet users. The global average internet speed stood at 6.1Mbps               

that year.  

 

With the proliferation of inexpensive smart phones, many of today’s 5 billion feature phone              

users will convert to internet users in the next 5 years. New users will mainly reside in countries                  

with strict or strengthening internet censorship. 

 

According to latest reports, the Virtual Private Network (VPN) market is expected to reach USD               

106 billion by 2022 at a CAGR (compound annual growth rate) of 13%.  

 

38 



 

 

 

The major driving factors of this market are increasing internet censorship, an increase in the               

number of loud security incidents, growing industries, and the increasing number of connected             

devices mostly in countries with strict internet censorship; countries like China, countries in Asia              

and Africa, and now Russia as well.  

 

There is no leader who controls more than 10% of the VPN market. Most of the 400 primary                  

VPN providers compete for a small fraction of market share.  

 

The most well-known players are: Hotspot Shield (Anchorfree ) backed with more than $62             1

million invested by VC’s, Zenmate with more than $3 million in investments, and Hidemyass              2

(Privax) that was acquired by AVG in 2015 for $40 million .  3

 

  

1https://www.crunchbase.com/organization/anchorfree 
2https://www.crunchbase.com/organization/zenguard 
3https://now.avg.com/avg-acquires-privax/ 

39 

https://www.crunchbase.com/organization/anchorfree
https://www.crunchbase.com/organization/zenguard
https://now.avg.com/avg-acquires-privax/


 

6.2 Cyber security and privacy protection 

 

According to Zion Market Research , the global cyber security market was valued at USD              4

105.45 billion in 2015; is expected to reach USD 181.77 billion in 2021 and is anticipated to                 

grow at a CAGR (compound annual growth rate) of 9.5% between 2016 and 2021.  

 

Cyber security is associated with information technology security, which focuses on protecting            

computers and confidential data stored in it from cyber criminals. The cyber security market              

provides several benefits, including enhanced security of cyberspaces, expanded digital          

safeguards, and quicker reaction time to national crises. These benefits automatically enhance the             

value of services to market end-users. 

 

An example of a major cyber security issue is linked ransomware attacks when people's              

computers are locked and bitcoin payment demanded by cyber criminals to unlock. These events              

have increased awareness of encryption and protection issues.  

 

 

Google Trends show spike of interest to ransomware, viruses, and bitcoins after attacks  

4https://www.zionmarketresearch.com/sample/cyber-security-market 

40 

https://www.zionmarketresearch.com/sample/cyber-security-market


 

The cyber security market is segmented based on security types, solution and vertical, and by               

regions. On the basis of security types, the market is divided into network security, cloud               

security, wireless security, and others. The cyber solution segment includes identity and access             

management (IAM), encryption, risk and compliance management, data loss prevention,          

antivirus and anti-malware, firewall, and others. By vertical, the market is segmented into             

aerospace, government, financial services, telecommunication, healthcare, and others. 

 

6.3 CDN  

 

Companies leverage Content Delivery Networks (CDN) to increase their online presence in the             

global market and deliver a high-quality user experience worldwide. CDNs improve site speed,             

page load times, availability, and performance dramatically. This not only results in higher             

end-user satisfaction but also increases customer adoption and conversion rates .  5

 

Market size and growth trends  

● The market size of CDN is expected to grow from $4.95 billion in 2015 to $15.73 billion                 

in 2020, and to $70.3 billion by 2025. 

● The mobile CDN market is estimated to grow from USD 2.11 billion in 2015 to USD                

13.40 billion in 2020, at a compound annual growth rate CAGR (compound annual             

growth rate) of 44.7% from 2015 to 2020. In regional segmentation, North America is              

expected to be the largest market in terms of market size, while APAC, Latin America,               

and MEA are expected to emerge rapidly in this market at high CAGRs. 

● The North American region dominated the CDN market in 2015 and is expected to reach               

$4.6 billion by 2017.  

● There are approximately 8.8 million websites using CDNs worldwide.  

● Out of the top 10,000 websites, 48.3% are currently using a CDN.  

● CDNs, globally, currently serve 50% of content consumed over the internet .  6

5https://www.cdnetworks.com/en/news/content-delivery-network-and-website-performance-stats-2016/513 
6https://www.cdnetworks.com/en/news/content-delivery-network-and-website-performance-stats-2016/513 

41 

https://www.cdnetworks.com/en/news/content-delivery-network-and-website-performance-stats-2016/513
https://www.cdnetworks.com/en/news/content-delivery-network-and-website-performance-stats-2016/513


 

● In 2018, worldwide online CDN traffic is expected to reach 72,893 petabytes per month.              

The data volume of global CDN internet traffic from 2016 to 2021 (in petabytes per               

month)  is illustrated in the graph below. 7

 

 

 

 

7https://www.statista.com/statistics/267184/content-delivery-network-internet-traffic-worldwide/ 

42 

https://www.statista.com/statistics/267184/content-delivery-network-internet-traffic-worldwide/


 

Growth drivers 

● Proliferation of rich media and video content - expected to grow at 4G speed 

● Increasing use of connected and smart devices 

● Optimized network solutions 

● Digitization among organizations 

● Highest growth in the online gaming industry 

 

Competitive landscape 

 

The top 10000 websites in the world use the following platforms :  8

 

 

 

  

8https://www.similartech.com/categories/content-delivery-network 

43 

https://www.similartech.com/categories/content-delivery-network


 

6.4 Business intelligence and data collecting (Proxy / Socks gateways) 

 

The global business intelligence (BI) market was worth $14.15 billion in 2015 and projected to               

reach $26.89 billion by 2020. BI technologies have slowly but steadily revolutionized the field of               

business strategy and management and penetrated all over the world . 9

 

Market size and growth trends  

● The global BI market is estimated to grow at a compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of                

9.5% between 2016 and 2021 . 10

● Global revenue in the BI and analytics software market is forecast to reach $18.3 billion               

in 2017, an increase of 7.3% from 2016, according to Gartner, Inc .  11

● Data discovery / visualization, self-service BI, and data quality / master data management             

are the three most important trends . 12

● While the use of traditional dashboard BI is receding into the background, self-service             

machine data analytics, self-service data discovery and explorations, and BI and analytics            

in the Cloud are rapidly gaining momentum across the global spectrum .  13

● There is increasing investment in robust BI platforms that can handle multiple data             

management capabilities such as integration, storage, visualization, statistical and         

quantitative analysis, instead of multiple specialty tools. 

 

9https://www.mordorintelligence.com/industry-reports/global-business-intelligence-bi-vendors-market-indu
stry 
10https://bi-survey.com/top-business-intelligence-trends-2017 
11http://www.gartner.com/newsroom/id/3612617 
12https://bi-survey.com/top-business-intelligence-trends-2017 
13http://www.dataversity.net/comparative-study-business-intelligence-analytics-market-trends/ 

44 

https://www.mordorintelligence.com/industry-reports/global-business-intelligence-bi-vendors-market-industry
https://www.mordorintelligence.com/industry-reports/global-business-intelligence-bi-vendors-market-industry
https://bi-survey.com/top-business-intelligence-trends-2017
http://www.gartner.com/newsroom/id/3612617
https://bi-survey.com/top-business-intelligence-trends-2017
http://www.dataversity.net/comparative-study-business-intelligence-analytics-market-trends/


 

 

 

 

Growth drivers 

● Increasing usage of data analytics 

● Rising penetration of cloud technologies 

● Need for complex datasets drives investments in data preparation 

45 



 

● Increasing adoption of BI in small- and medium-sized enterprises 

● Support for real-time events and streaming data 

 

 

 

Competitive landscape (including list of most prominent players) 

 

● Some of the key players in the global BI market include Information Builders,             

International Business Machines Corporation, Datawatch, Microsoft Corporation,       

Microstrategy, Inc., Oracle Corporation, Panorama, Pentaho (a Hitachi Company), Qlik          

Technologies, SAP SE, SAS Institute, Sisense Inc., Tableau Software, Tibco Software,           

and Yellowfin International Pty Ltd.  

● Gartner’s Magic Quadrant for Business Intelligence and Analytics Platforms. 

● Services like ​http://luminati.io/​. 

 

 

  

46 

http://luminati.io/


 

6.5 Mobile apps and software monetization  

 

Trends point to hybrid monetization models, such as in-app ads and in-app purchases. In-app              

advertising is set to be a key driver of mobile growth over the coming years. 

 

Market size and growth trends 

 

● In 2015, the mobile app industry generated $69.7 billion in gross annual revenue; it is               

projected to exceed $189 billion by 2020 .  14

 

 

● The worldwide in-app advertising and app store revenues of mobile apps and games in              

2015 and predicted in 2020 is illustrated below (in billion US$): 

14https://www.statista.com/statistics/293636/app-store-composition-business-models/ 

47 

https://www.statista.com/statistics/293636/app-store-composition-business-models/


 

 

 

● May 2016 - Android device owners spent an average of $15.53 making in-app gaming              

purchases; in contrast, iOS device owners spent $10.96.  15

● December 2016: 92% of games on Google Play were free to download, and 23% of those                

used in-app purchases as a monetization model .  16

● Top app monetization models according to mobile developers worldwide (June 2015): 

 

15https://www.statista.com/statistics/673479/mobile-games-Android-share-monetization-model/ 
16https://www.statista.com/statistics/673479/mobile-games-Android-share-monetization-model/ 

48 

https://www.statista.com/statistics/673479/mobile-games-android-share-monetization-model/
https://www.statista.com/statistics/673479/mobile-games-android-share-monetization-model/


 

● North America is the leading region in third party in-app advertising both in absolute and               

relative terms; Asia Pacific will record the largest increase in the next five years at a                

177% compound annual growth rate between 2015 and 2020. 

 

Growth drivers 

● Customization apps 

● Aggregator apps 

● Enterprise apps – micro and hybrid 

● Software subscription model 

● Messaging apps 

● Internet of Things  17

● Android First  18

● UX, accessibility, and security are more important than ever 

 

Competitive landscape 

● 9 million mobile app developers in the world; 60% make $500 or less profit per month 

● Less than 0.1% of all apps are commercially successful 

● Companies that focus on mobile in-app advertising command the majority of the mobile             

advertising market and companies that focus on native advertising as a primary revenue             

stream are the most successful at monetizing through mobile .  19

● Top app monetization solution providers include:  20

○ Google AdMob 

○ Facebook Audience Network 

○ Inneractive 

○ OpenX Mobile 

○ Unity Ads 

17https://www.cnbc.com/2015/11/09/forrester-mobile-predictions-for-2016.html 
18http://r-stylelab.com/company/blog/mobile-technologies/mobile-app-development-trends-for-2017-beyon
d 
19https://www.smashingmagazine.com/2017/02/current-trends-future-prospects-mobile-app-market/ 
20http://www.businessofapps.com/top-app-monetization-platforms/ 

49 

https://www.cnbc.com/2015/11/09/forrester-mobile-predictions-for-2016.html
http://r-stylelab.com/company/blog/mobile-technologies/mobile-app-development-trends-for-2017-beyond
http://r-stylelab.com/company/blog/mobile-technologies/mobile-app-development-trends-for-2017-beyond
https://www.smashingmagazine.com/2017/02/current-trends-future-prospects-mobile-app-market/
http://www.businessofapps.com/top-app-monetization-platforms/


 

7. Products and services – Proof of Concept  
 

This section will describe Proof of Concept (PoC) products based on the Privatix Network, as               

well as the concept of the exit nodes software for Agents (owners of exit nodes). 

 

7.1 Privatix.Agent - cross-platform software for exit nodes owners  

 

This software is the primary component of the Privatix Network as it is the one that technically                 

and practically allows the Agents to join the network and start selling their internet bandwidth. 

 

USE CASE 

- The user learns about the opportunity to earn by selling his unused broadband 

- The user downloads software for his operating system and launches it 

- The user sets the percentage of the traffic that he wishes to share and registers on the                 

network 

- After connecting to the network, the user turns into an Agent, his IP is recorded on the                 

network, and Clients can now connect to him  

- The user can see all accounting and stats in real time 

- After accumulating a balance in PRIX tokens, the user can sell them on the exchange               

straight way or order withdrawal in a fiat currency. After that, we will sell their token at                 

the exchange and send the payment to the user in a fiat currency. 

 

Alternative solution on the market: ​https://mysterium.network​ (concept only) 

 

50 

https://mysterium.network/


 

USER INTERFACE PROTOTYPE

 

Privatix.Agent will be developed on major platforms in order to create total operational system              

coverage.  

 

The user will also be able to choose if he wants to share his connection for torrenting or not;                   

there are many countries where torrenting is forbidden and fines may be imposed. We will               

pre-set by default countries where this policy is applied, and disable the torrenting option in               

advance.  

  

51 



 

7.2 Consumer VPN based on DPI-free VPN protocol 

 

VPN means Virtual Private Network, a secure tunnel between two or more devices. VPN creates               

a secure tunnel between your computer and the internet, allowing you to surf the web               

anonymously from wherever you want. VPN also hide your IP address and changes it to another                

one.  

 

Classic VPN providers use dedicated servers around the world and standard VPN protocols like              

Openvpn, pptp,l2tp,sstp, etc.  

 

VPN shields your privacy, helps to avoid internet censorship and encrypts your transferred data.              

The problem of centralized VPN is DPI-based blockers (utilized in China) and data server’s IP’s               

that detect when you use a VPN.  

 

VPNs based on the Privatix Network will allow you to surf between millions of exit nodes at the                  

best available speed and use advanced modified VPN connections that are undetectable by DPIs.              

If you choose to be a peer in the network, you will be able to pay for it by sharing your traffic                      

with other users. If you get more traffic than you give you will have to pay the difference. Vice                   

versa the difference will be paid to you. 

 

Classic VPN service Decentralized p2p VPN on blockchain 

● Focused on owner's profit ONLY 
● High profit margins  
● Huge marketing and data costs 
● No complete anonymity 
● Risk of data access by a third-party       

Can be blocked by sophisticated DPI 
● The fact of using VPN is visible 
● Slow speed and unstable connection  

● Focus on network participants’ benefits 
● Fair prices without middleman margins 
● Low traffic expenses 
● Full anonymity 
● No private data and logging, no access for a         

third-party 
●  Can’t be blocked 
● The fact of using VPN is invisible 
● High speed and stable connection 

 

 

52 



 

Prototype of VPN client based on P2P participation in the Privatix Network 

 

 

 

 

  

53 



 

7.3 Privatix.BOX - portable VPN router  

 

A hardware device (basically an advanced DD-WRT router with pre-set configuration) which             

allows: 

● Connection to the Privatix Network as an Agent without the need to install special              

software 

● Shared VPN-protected connection via Wi-Fi 

 

Members of the Privatix team have been using our prototypes of these devices, which we created                

on the basis of popular DD-WRT routers, for a long time. This device is particularly useful for                 

travelers and acts as Agent and Client in the Privatix Network without the need to install any                 

software. We also plan to produce these devices in partnership with a suitable manufacturer. 

 

USE CASE 

- A user goes on vacation with his family and stays in a hotel 

- The user connects Privatix.BOX to an unprotected Wi-Fi hotspot in the hotel 

- The user encrypts his connection and shares this safe connection with other family             

members via Wi-Fi 

54 



 

- If the user opted to be an Agent (share broadband), then most likely the user will get an                  

excellent and fast VPN at no cost at all. 

 

Alternative centralized solution / product on the market: ​https://keezel.co​,  ​https://betterspot.com  

 

7.4 Advanced Proxy / Socks selling API platform  

 

When the Privatix Network is established, it will contain hundreds of thousands, even millions,              

of connected devices (Agents) and most of them will have residential IP-addresses.  

 

 

 

 

For thousands of companies and businesses, residential proxies are a vital and also scarce              

resource. Online retailers collecting comparative pricing information, developers testing their          

web sites from any city in the world, large ad networks using proxies for ensuring the ads they                  

55 

https://keezel.co/
https://betterspot.com/


 

deliver are safe and compliant, cybersecurity firms checking sites are not malicious, and business              

intelligence tools use thousands of proxies every day to parse search engines or competitors’              

websites.  

 

Our product will include an advanced API through which anyone will be able to buy the use of                  

proxies (traffic) from Privatix Network Agents in a convenient and easy way.  

 

USE CASE  

- A large online retailer deals with the daily challenge of collecting data on positions and               

prices on their competitors’ websites 

- Data parsing directly from their servers using datacenter IP addresses even in the rotation              

does not work. The IPs are quickly detected by the competitor and blocked. 

- By connecting their software to the platform API, the retailer’s developers can buy an              

unlimited number of proxies with residential IP addresses and completely mask their            

activity 

- Rotating them and paying only for traffic means the retailer can solve their business              

objectives in very simple and convenient way  

 

 

7.5 Infrastructure for VPN providers  

 

All classic VPN providers on the market today use the infrastructure of dedicated servers in               

different data centers and purchase IPV4 IP address pools. This has a number of serious               

shortcomings: 

 

● Limited ability to buy new IPV4 IP addresses 

● Expensive maintenance of server infrastructure, balancing, etc. 

● High broadband costs 

56 



 

● Most IP addresses from the data center are easily detected and blocked, unlike the IP               

addresses of home or small offices computers (residential IPs) 

 

Replacing the infrastructure of dedicated servers with a convenient and affordable platform that             

can be implemented in the product will transform this market, dramatically reduce the cost of               

broadband for VPN providers, and improve their ability to stay unblockable with residential IP              

addresses. 

 

7.6 Decentralized CDN on blockchain 

 

At Privatix Network, we do not want “merely” to develop awesome products, eliminate the 

middleman and reduce prices, but to speed up the entire internet as well. 

 

Classic CDN today is a very profitable business. However, content is becoming heavier, and 

more expensive, because of the increasing use of HD videos, games and streaming content.  

 

The average price for content delivery today is $0.05 - $0.30 per GB. We believe that by using                  

Agents’ broadband from Privatix Network will allow slashing prices 5 or even 10 fold The main                

condition for this is a large number of Agents in the network. 

 

This proposal is concept-based and can only be developed if the network grows big enough and                

we have funds to invest in R&D. 

 

Alternative centralized solution / product on the market: ​https://holacdn.com/ 

 

  

57 

https://holacdn.com/


 

7.7 Privatix.FAAS - anti-censorship solution for developers 

 

Freedom as a Service (FaaS) - this is the driving force behind Privatix.FAAS. Our goal is to                 

create powerful SDKs that will eliminate the need for developers to worry whether their app will                

be blocked in some country or not.  

 

Privatix will provide a mobile SDK that will be easy to integrate into any mobile application or                 

software and give developers the ability to send all traffic via the Privatix Network’s secure               

Agents’ proxies, ensuring users always have secure and private access to their applications and              

are never blocked. 

 

Alternative centralized solution / product on the market: ​https://www.anchorfree.com/sdk/ 

 

7.8 Privatix.Monetize - mobile apps and software monetization platform 

 

Developers build applications used by millions of people and, in many cases they can’t monetize               

it as they would like to do.  

 

The most popular monetization methods are paid subscription and ad injection. Both methods             

always lead to a huge outflow of users, and a decrease in virality as users do not like to pay to                     

watch ads. 

 

Privatix.Monetize will offer developers an SDK that will help to monetize their apps without ads               

or paid content using the following scheme. Users install the app, which registers in the Privatix                

Network as an Agent and starts selling the users’ idle bandwidth while the developer gets the                

payment for the traffic. 

 

Alternative centralized solution / product on the market: ​http://luminati.io/sdk 

 

58 

https://www.anchorfree.com/sdk/
http://luminati.io/sdk


 

8. The Privatix team  
 

Our team has an established record of creating world-class internet services in the VPN and               

cyber security arena for more than 10 years. We have the proven ability to develop amazing                

products and run successful internet businesses. Check out our products and maybe you discover              

that you are already our customer. 

 

8.1 Our last projects track record 

 

The Privatix team currently serves more than 50,000 active users per day and transfers over 10                

Petabyte traffic per month through more than 150 of its servers. The customers of our internet                

services and projects are, literally, millions of users. We know exactly how to build, manage and                

develop products in the areas of privacy and internet security. You can read below about some of                 

our current projects.  

 

Name Privatix VPN  

URL https://privatix.com 

Exists since  2015 

Market VPN service and privacy protection 

Business model Freemium + ad-based 

Platforms Native mobile apps on  iOS and Android; browser 
extensions for Chrome, Opera, and Firefox; and desktop 
software on Windows 

Total users More than 1,250,000  

Daily active users (DAU) ~50,000 - 70,000 

Average growth rate (monthly) 9-10% per month in last 2 years 

 
  

59 



 

 

Name Temp-mail - temporary email service 

URL https://temp-mail.org 

Android app link Google Play 

Ios app link App Store 

Exists since 2012 

Market Internet services  - email  

Business model Advertising 

Audience More than 200,000 daily and ~5 billion per  month 

Mobile apps installs More than 500,000 in last 6 months (organic)  

Average growth rate (monthly) 5-10% per month in last two years 

 
 

8.3 Our “Unfair Advantage” 

 

Almost always, behind great ideas stand dreamers, advocates of the “idea first” paradigm. Ideas              

are important but without resources, knowledge, skills, and experience they remain elusive. 

 

At Privatix there are all the necessary components of a successful team that has proved itself in                 

various projects over the past years, and our record is demonstrable. This team will become the                

backbone of the future Privatix Network company which will attract even more talented             

employees with vision and entrepreneurial spirit, and the hi-tech skills needed in this demanding              

industry. 

 

This is the first time we have tried to attract investments. But now it has became clear to us that                    

it is simply impossible to implement such a large-scale project as Privatix Network without              

significant funding. Our goals and intentions are clear, and we know how to achieve them.               

Believe in us now and you will participate in the birth of a new global company that will change                   

the world for a better one. 

60 

https://temp-mail.org/
https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.tempmail
https://itunes.apple.com/app/temp-mail-temporary-email/id1214259095


 

 

9. Roadmap 
 

9.1 First steps after Token Sale  

 

Our plan is to complete the Token Sale by the end of October/ November 2017. Then we will                  

have several months until the end of the year in which we want to prepare the company for the                   

next steps as quickly and efficiently as possible. 

 

9.1.1 First month priorities 

 

We have some top priority tasks that must be finalized in the first month after Token Sale.  We 

will report on these steps and our progress to the community: 

 

● Distributing all bounty tokens to participants and suppliers  

● New office spaces renting or expanding current ones in Ukraine, Israel, and Russia 

● Transferring to third-party management, “canning / preserve”, or sale of existing projects            

of the company 

● Hiring administrative personnel 

 

 

9.1.2 Legal, HR and administrative issues  

 

Some legal formalities, as well as financial business processes, will need to be adjusted and               

facilitated during this period. 

 

Also, the procedure for selecting and hiring new team members will be started. The procedure               

for hiring talented people is not always easy and it can be time-consuming to source the best, but                  

61 



 

with our experience and funding, we will be able to afford to hire the most skilled and motivated                  

people. We know exactly who we are looking for.  

 

9.2 Q4 / 2017 - Q2 / 2018 : Privatix Network Core Development 

 

The final quarter of 2017 and the first two quarters of 2018 will be used to develop a prototype                   

and Alpha version of the Privatix Network, as well as cross-platform software for Agents. 

 

Deadline:​ The end of the second quarter of 2018 

 

9.2.1 Privatix Network - Alpha  

 

The first release of the Privatix Network will include centralized elements and will be available               

in open source to receive feedback from the community by the end of the second quarter of 2018. 

 

9.2.2 Privatix.Agent - cross-platform software for exit nodes owners 

 

This product is one of the two most important foundations of the entire Privatix Network, since it                 

allows you to route traffic and sell internet bandwidth to the network. 

 

The first versions for such popular platforms as Windows, Ubuntu, Android, MacOS, iOS will be               

developed. 

 

9.3 Q3 - Q4 / 2018 : Proof of Concept (PoC) products and Network 

 

For two quarters, further development of the Privatix Network will be conducted taking into              

account feedback from the community. At the end of that period, the Beta release of the network                 

will be made, which in essence will be a fully working version. 

 

62 



 

At the same time, on the basis of the Alpha version of the network, the development of products                  

based on the network will begin; these products will ensure there is adequate demand for               

broadband. We hope to reduce development time through partnerships or the creation of             

specialized individual teams and business units in the company. 

 

Deadline​: The fourth quarter of 2018 

 

9.3.1 Consumer VPN, based on DPI-free VPN protocol  

 

In the development of standard VPN services we have no competitors. However, we are dealing               

with VPN on blockchain with a completely different level of development. VPN applications             

will be developed for all popular operating systems and platforms for maximum market             

coverage. 

 

9.3.2 Advanced Proxy / Socks selling API platform 

 

A unique platform on which it is possible to use the API to buy multiple outgoing residential IP                  

addresses and their associated spare internet broadband. We expect that this product will allow              

us to create a huge demand for traffic on the network and therefore we have made it one of our                    

priorities.  

 

9.3.3 Privatix Network - Beta release  

 

The second (Beta) release of the network will be a fully working Network but with some                

centralized elements. These elements will be fully transferred to the blockchain with the final              

release of the network in the next stage. 

 

9.4 Q1 - Q2 / 2019 : Additional Proof of Concept (PoC) products and Network 

 

63 



 

At the beginning of 2019 our company will already have a fully working Network, so the work                 

that will be conducted in the first two quarters of 2019 will relate to its final release and the                   

transfer of all elements to the blockchain. Also in the first two quarters of 2019, two more                 

products will be created based on the Network. 

 

Deadline for release​: The second quarter of 2019 

Note:​ This stage will be implemented if the maximum goal (hard cap) is reached. 

 

9.4.1 Privatix Network - Final release  

 

The final release of the network means that from then on it becomes completely autonomous and                

any developer can use it to create their own products. 

 

9.4.2 Privatix.FAAS (SDK) 

 

A product that removes the need for developers to worry that their application will be blocked                

from any source, whether by a local firewall at the ISP level or a global block at governmental                  

level. 

 

9.4.3 Privatix.Monetize (SDK) 

 

This product will allow developers to earn more on their applications and programs. By              

installing our SDK, the developer will be able to monetize a portion of users’ spare bandwidth. 

 

9.5 Q3 - Q4 / 2019 : Proof of Concept (PoC) products and Network 

 

In the second half of 2019, having already a working and autonomous Privatix Network, we will                

be able to develop additional products based on it, which will increase the number of participants                

and, accordingly, the demand for the token itself. 

64 



 

 

Deadline for releases​: end of 2019. 

Note​: This stage will be implemented if the maximum goal (hard cap) is reached. 

 

9.5.1 Privatix.BOX (Hardware) 

 

A physical device that allows you to simultaneously become an Agent of a Privatix Network and                

also use VPN functions as a Network Client. This device can also be used as a secure Wi-Fi                  

router. 

 

9.5.2 Infrastructure for VPN providers 

 

We plan to create a product in the form of a network-based service and essentially resell the                 

broadband to existing VPN providers. They will be able to use the traffic from the Privatix                

Network instead of buying it from internet hosts, and thereby save costs without losing quality. 

 

 

10. Additional information 
 

10.1 Legal protection framework for exit nodes owners 

 

We will develop a legal framework to help exit node owners (Agents) to handle situations when                

they are accused of improper activity by someone who used their node (IP address) .  

 

The basic concept behind this proposal is that certain responsibilities will be transferred from              

Agents to our company. We will provide to all Agents a document stating that we as a company                  

lease their network for our use and resell it. This document will contain the Agent’s node IP and                  

hash in blockchain and the Agent will be able to download it from his dashboard.  

65 



 

 

For example, in the event an exit node was compromised by criminal activity and police make an                 

investigation, the Agent can print the document and give it to the investigators. Based on node                

hash and timestamps, the investigators can find on open blockchain related and relevant             

information, and also contact us and make request for additional data.  

 

We will also try to provide legal help and assistance to investigators and compromised Agents in                

serious cases at our cost. We will take out some insurance as well; insurance that we can extend                  

to all our Agents in future to cover these types of expenses, should the need arise.  

 

Anonymity is the basis of our network. Of course it has certain risks, but in response to these                  

risks we are going to free Agents from legal responsibility rather than stake out every user. 

 

10.2 Solution for mass adoption problem  

 

As advocates of blockchain principles and a decentralized economy, we certainly support the             

idea that all payments need to be executed internally with our tokens inside our crypto-economy.               

Even though this is our paramount goal, we understand that it would make it quite difficult to                 

achieve mass adoption and tempt Agents. At this time, only a fraction of people understand the                

crypto-economy concept and we don’t have time to wait for the entire internet to climb on board;                 

that could take years.  

 

In order to grow as fast as possible within these limitations, we will develop a centralized                

exchange gateway to the Privatix crypto-economy in order to create a bigger supply of spare               

broadband and multiply the number of Agents quickly. Thus, not just users that are familiar with                

the crypto-world will be able to be an Agent and profit from spare broadband, but all regular                 

internet users as well.  

 

66 



 

These Agents will see the PRIX token as internal currency and the instant value of these tokens                 

in fiat currency at the same time. For example, if an Agent accumulated the equivalent of “100”                 

in some fiat currency and demanded to be paid, we would provide a simple mechanism to                

withdraw this token though exchange to fiat and pay him using a common payment system.  

 

10.3 Commitment to open source community  

 

Our team strongly believe in open source and make a promise after three years to contribute 5%                 

from Privatix profits to the development of important open source projects.  

 

10.4 Legal disclaimers  

 

THIS DOCUMENT DOES NOT CONSTITUTE AN OFFER TO SELL, AN INVITATION TO            

INDUCE AN OFFER, OR A SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO ACQUIRE SECURITIES.  

 

THIS DOCUMENT IS PROVIDED FOR INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY AND DOES          

NOT CONSTITUTE INVESTMENT ADVICE.  

 

OUR WHITE PAPER MAY CONTAIN ‘FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS’ - THAT IS,          

STATEMENTS RELATED TO FUTURE, NOT PAST, EVENTS. IN THIS CONTEXT,          

FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS OFTEN ADDRESS OUR EXPECTED FUTURE       

BUSINESS AND ORGANIZATIONAL PLANS, THE PERFORMANCE, AND       

DEVELOPMENT OF THE PRIVATIX PLATFORM INTEGRATED WITH BLOCKCHAIN,        

AND OFTEN CONTAIN WORDS SUCH AS 'EXPECT', 'ANTICIPATE', 'INTEND', 'PLAN',          

'WILL', 'WOULD', 'ESTIMATE', 'FORECAST' OR 'TARGET'. SUCH FORWARD-LOOKING        

STATEMENTS BY THEIR NATURE ADDRESS MATTERS THAT ARE, TO DIFFERENT          

DEGREES, UNCERTAIN. WE CANNOT GUARANTEE THAT ANY FORWARD LOOKING         

STATEMENTS, BACKTESTS OR EXPERIMENTS MADE BY US OR EXPECTED         

67 



 

RESULTS OF OPERATION OF THE PRIVATIX PLATFORM WILL CORRELATE WITH          

THE ACTUAL FUTURE FACTS OR RESULTS.  

 

ALL POTENTIAL RISKS CAN BE ASSESSED HERE       

https://dxw4crzwfgmzw.cloudfront.net/site/risk-factors.pdf  

 

THE SALE OF PRIX TOKENS CONSTITUTES THE SALE OF A LEGAL SOFTWARE            

PRODUCT UNDER GIBRALTAR LAW. THIS PRODUCT SALE IS CONDUCTED BY          

PRIVATIX TOKEN LIMITED, A GIBRALTAR LIMITED COMPANY, OPERATING        

UNDER GIBRALTAR LAW. IT IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF EACH POTENTIAL          

PURCHASER OF PRIX TOKENS TO DETERMINE IF THE PURCHASER CAN LEGALLY           

PURCHASE PRIX TOKENS IN THE PURCHASER’S JURISDICTION AND WHETHER         

THE PURCHASER CAN THEN RESELL THE PRIX TOKENS TO ANOTHER PURCHASER           

IN ANY GIVEN JURISDICTION.  

 

To be used if the White Paper and other documents will be available in multiple languages: 

 

FOR THE CONVENIENCE OF OUR USERS, THE PRIVATIX WHITE PAPER, WEBSITE           

AND OTHER RELATED DOCUMENTS ARE AVAILABLE IN A NUMBER OF          

LANGUAGES. IN THE EVENT THERE IS ANY CONFLICT BETWEEN THE ENGLISH           

LANGUAGE VERSION AND A FOREIGN LANGUAGE VERSION, THE ENGLISH         

LANGUAGE VERSION SHALL GOVERN. 

 

10.5 RISK FACTORS 

 

You should carefully consider and evaluate each of the following risk factors and all other               

information contained in the Terms of Token Sale (the “Terms”) before deciding to participate in               

the Privatix Token Sale (“Token Sale”). To the best of Privatix Token Ltd.’s (the “Company”)               

knowledge and belief, all risk factors which are material to you in making an informed decision                

68 

https://dxw4crzwfgmzw.cloudfront.net/site/risk-factors.pdf


 

to participate in the Token Sale have been set out below. If any of the following considerations,                 

uncertainties or material risks develops into actual events, the business, financial position and/or             

results of operations of the Company and the maintenance and level of usage of the Privatix                

platform and the Privatix Tokens (“PRIX”) could be materially and adversely affected. In such              

cases, the trading price of PRIX Tokens (in the case where they are listed on a cryptocurrency                 

exchange) could decline due to any of these considerations, uncertainties or material risks, and              

you may lose all or part of your PRIX Tokens. 

 

RISKS RELATING TO PARTICIPATION IN THE TOKEN SALE 

 

There is no prior market for PRIX Tokens and the Token Sale may not result in an active or                   

liquid market for the PRIX Tokens  

Prior to the Token Sale, there has been no public market for the PRIX Tokens. Although the                 

Company will use reasonable endeavors to seek the approval for availability of the PRIX Tokens               

for trading on a cryptocurrency exchange, there is no assurance that such approval will be               

obtained. Furthermore, even if such approval is granted by a cryptocurrency exchange, there is              

no assurance that an active or liquid trading market for the PRIX Tokens will develop or if                 

developed, be sustained after the PRIX Tokens have been made available for trading on such               

cryptocurrency exchange. There is also no assurance that the market price of the PRIX Tokens               

will not decline below the original purchase price (the “Purchase Price”). The Purchase Price              

may not be indicative of the market price of the PRIX Tokens after they have been made                 

available for trading on a cryptocurrency exchange. 

A PRIX Token is not a currency issued by any central bank or national, supra-national or                

quasi-national organization, nor is it backed by any hard assets or other credit. The Company is                

not responsible for nor does it pursue the circulation and trading of PRIX Tokens on the market.                 

Trading of PRIX Tokens will merely depend on the consensus on its value between the relevant                

market participants, and no one is obliged to purchase any PRIX Token from any holder of the                 

PRIX Token, including the purchasers, nor does anyone guarantee the liquidity or market price              

of PRIX Tokens to any extent at any time.  

69 



 

Furthermore, PRIX Tokens may not be resold to purchasers who are citizens or permanent              

residents of, People’s Republic of China, Republic of Korea (including its territories and             

possessions) or any other jurisdiction where the purchase of PRIX Tokens may be in violation of                

applicable laws. Accordingly, the Company cannot ensure that there will be any demand or              

market for PRIX Tokens, or that the Purchase Price is indicative of the market price of PRIX                 

Tokens after they have been made available for trading on a cryptocurrency exchange.  

Future sales or issuance of the PRIX Tokens could materially and adversely affect the market               

price of PRIX Tokens 

Any future sale or issuance of the PRIX Tokens would increase the supply of PRIX Tokens in                 

the market and this may result in a downward price pressure on the PRIX Token. The sale or                  

distribution of a significant number of PRIX Tokens outside of the Token Sale (including but not                

limited to the sales of PRIX Tokens undertaken after the completion of the initial token sale,                

issuance of PRIX Tokens to persons other than purchasers for purposes of community and              

employee initiatives, affiliate (or bounty) program development, academic research, education          

and market expansion and issuance of PRIX Tokens as a reward to employees and/or users of the                 

Privatix platform), or the mere perception that such further sales or issuance may occur, could               

adversely affect the trading price of the PRIX Tokens. 

Negative publicity may materially and adversely affect the price of the PRIX Tokens  

Negative publicity involving the Company, the Privatix platform, the PRIX Tokens or any of the               

key personnel of the Company, may materially and adversely affect the market perception or              

market price of the PRIX Tokens, whether or not it is justified. 

We may not be able to pay any anticipated rewards in the future  

There is no assurance that there will be any transaction volume such that you will receive any                 

rewards anticipated to be distributed to active users of the Privatix platform. Further, even in the                

event there is substantial transaction volume and interactions among the users and the Privatix              

platform, there is no assurance you personally will receive any part of the rewards. This is                

because the ability of the Company to pay any reward to you will depend on the future results of                   

operations and the future business and financial condition of the Company and there is no               

70 



 

assurance of the future results of operations and the future business and financial condition of the                

Company.  

There is no assurance of any success of Privatix Platform or any Future Business Line  

The value of, and demand for, the PRIX Tokens hinges heavily on the performance of the                

Privatix platform. There is no assurance that the Privatix platform will gain traction after its               

launch and achieve any commercial success. Although the Company has performed some testing,             

including QA-testing of the Privatix platform with relatively positive results, the Privatix            

platform has not been fully developed and finalized and is subject to further changes, updates               

and adjustments prior to its launch. Such changes may result in unexpected and unforeseen              

effects on its projected appeal to users, possibly due to the failure to meet users’ preconceived                

expectations based on the beta version, and hence impact its success. Limited usage of the               

Privatix platform and potential lack of trust for its crowdsourced predictive accuracy would             

impact the public demand for the PRIX Tokens and correspondingly the trading price of the               

PRIX Tokens. 

The trading price of the PRIX Tokens may fluctuate following the Token Generation Event  

The prices of cryptographic tokens in general tend to be relatively volatile, and can fluctuate               

significantly over short periods of time. The demand for, and corresponding the market price of,               

the PRIX Tokens may fluctuate significantly and rapidly in response to, among others, the              

following factors, some of which are beyond the control of the Company: 

(a) new technical innovations;  

(b) analysts’ speculations, recommendations, perceptions or estimates of the PRIX Token’s           

market price or the Company’s financial and business performance;  

(c) changes in market valuations and token prices of entities with businesses similar to that of the                 

Company that may be listed on the same cryptocurrency exchanges as the PRIX Tokens;  

(d) announcements by the Company of significant events, for example partnerships,           

sponsorships, new product developments;  

(e) fluctuations in market prices and trading volume of cryptocurrencies on cryptocurrency            

exchanges;  

(f) additions or departures of key personnel of the Company;  

71 



 

(h) success or failure of the Company’s management in implementing business, development and             

growth strategies; 

(i) changes in conditions affecting the blockchain or sport technology industry, the general             

economic conditions or market sentiments, or other events or factors. 

The funds raised in the Token Sale are exposed to risks of theft  

Further, upon receipt of the funds, the Company will make every effort to ensure that the funds                 

received will be securely held through the implementation of security measures. Notwithstanding            

such security measures, there is no assurance that there will be no theft of the cryptocurrencies as                 

a result of hacks, sophisticated cyber-attacks, distributed denials of service or errors,            

vulnerabilities or defects on the Token Sale website, in the smart contract(s), if used, on which                

the escrow wallet and the Token Sale may rely, on the Ethereum or any other blockchain, or                 

otherwise. Such events may include, for example, flaws in programming or source code leading              

to exploitation or abuse thereof. In such event, even if the Token Sale is completed, the                

Company may not be able to receive the cryptocurrencies raised and may not be able to use such                  

funds for the development of the Privatix platform and/or for launching the Privatix platform,              

including but not limited to the structuring and through developing of the Privatix peer-to-peer              

bandwidth marketplace. In such case, the launch of the Privatix platform might be temporarily or               

permanently curtailed. As such, distributed PRIX Tokens may hold little worth or value, and this               

would impact its trading price. 

 

RISKS RELATING TO PRIVATIX TOKEN LIMITED.  

The Privatix platform is developed, operated and maintained by Privatix Token Limited. Any             

events or circumstances which adversely affect Privatix Token Limited or any of its successor              

operating entities (collectively referred to herein as “Privatix Token Limited”) may have a             

corresponding adverse effect on the Privatix platform. Such adverse effects would           

correspondingly have an impact on the utility, liquidity, and the trading price of the PRIX               

Tokens.  

Privatix Token Limited may be materially and adversely affected if it fails to effectively manage               

its operations as its business develops and evolves, which would have a direct impact on its                

72 



 

ability to maintain the Privatix platform. The sport media technology and cryptocurrency            

industries, and the markets in which Privatix Token Limited competes have grown rapidly over              

the past years and continue to evolve in response to new technological advances, changing              

business models and other factors. As a result of this constantly changing environment, Privatix              

Token Limited may face operational difficulties in adjusting to the changes, and the             

sustainability of Privatix Token Limited will depend on its ability to manage its operations and               

ensure that it hires qualified and competent employees, and provides proper training for its              

personnel. As its business evolves, Privatix Token Limited must also expand and adapt its              

operational infrastructure. Privatix Token Limited’s business relies on its blockchain-based          

software systems, cryptocurrency wallets or other related token storage mechanisms, blockchain           

technology and smart contract technology, if used, and on machine learning and artificial             

intelligence platforms. All of these systems and tools represent complex, costly, and rapidly             

changing technical infrastructure. In order to demonstrate continued ability to effectively manage            

technical support infrastructure for the Privatix platform, Privatix Token Limited will need to             

continue to upgrade and improve its data systems and other operational systems, procedures and              

controls. These upgrades and improvements will require a dedication of resources, are likely to              

be complex and increasingly rely on hosted computer services from third parties that Privatix              

Token Limited does not control. If Privatix Token Limited is unable to adapt its systems and                

organization in a timely, efficient and cost-effective manner to accommodate changing           

circumstances, its business, financial condition and results of operations may be adversely            

affected. If the third parties whom Privatix Token Limited relies on are subject to a security                

breach or otherwise suffer disruptions that impact the services Privatix Token Limited uses, the              

integrity and availability of its internal information could be compromised, which may            

consequently cause the loss of confidential or proprietary information, and economic loss. The             

loss of financial, labor or other resources, and any other adverse effect on Privatix Token               

Limited’s business, financial condition and operations, would have a direct adverse effect on             

Privatix Token Limited’s ability to maintain the Privatix platform. Any adverse effects affecting             

Privatix Token Limited’s business or technology are likely to also adversely impact the utility,              

liquidity, and trading price of the PRIX Tokens. 

73 



 

Privatix Token Limited may experience system failures, unplanned interruptions in its network            

or services, hardware or software defects, security breaches or other causes that could adversely              

affect Privatix Token Limited’s infrastructure network, and/or the Privatix platform. 

Privatix Token Limited is not able to anticipate when there would be occurrences of hacks,               

cyber- attacks, distributed denials of service or errors, vulnerabilities or defects in the Privatix              

platform, in the smart contracts, if used, or on the Ethereum or any other blockchain technology.                

Such events may include, for example, flaws in programming or source code leading to              

exploitation or abuse thereof. Privatix Token Limited may not be able to detect such hacks,               

cyber-attacks, distributed denials of service errors vulnerabilities or defects in a timely manner,             

and may not have sufficient resources to efficiently cope with multiple service incidents             

happening simultaneously or in rapid succession. 

Privatix Token Limited’s network or services, which would include the Privatix platform, could             

be disrupted by numerous events, including natural disasters, equipment breakdown, network           

connectivity downtime, power losses, or even intentional disruptions of its services, such as             

disruptions caused by software viruses or attacks by unauthorized users, some of which are              

beyond Privatix Token Limited’s control. Although Privatix Token Limited has taken steps            

against malicious attacks on its platform or its infrastructure, which are critical for the              

maintenance of the Privatix platform, there can be no assurance that cyber-attacks, such as              

distributed denials of service, will not be attempted in the future, that Company’s enhanced              

security measures will be effective. Privatix Token Limited may be prone to attacks on its               

infrastructure intended to steal information about its technology, financial data or user            

information or take other actions that would be damaging to the Company and/or holders of the                

PRIX Tokens. Any significant breach of the Company’s security measures or other disruptions             

resulting in a compromise of the usability, stability and security of the Privatix platform may               

adversely affect the utility, liquidity and/or trading price of the PRIX Tokens. 

We are dependent in part on the location and data center facilities of third parties  

Privatix Token Limited’s current infrastructure network is in part established through servers            

which it owns and houses at the location facilities of third parties, and servers that it rents at data                   

center facilities of third parties. If the Company is unable to renew its data facility lease on                 

74 



 

commercially reasonable terms or at all, Privatix Token Limited may be required to transfer its               

servers to a new data center facility, and may incur significant costs and possible service               

interruption in connection with the relocation. These facilities are also vulnerable to damage or              

interruption from, among others, natural disasters, arson, terrorist attacks, power losses, and            

telecommunication failures. Additionally, the third party providers of such facilities may suffer a             

breach of security as a result of third party action, employee error, malfeasance or otherwise, and                

a third party may obtain unauthorized access to the data in such servers. As techniques used to                 

obtain unauthorized access to, or to sabotage systems change frequently and generally are not              

recognized until launched against a target, Privatix Token Limited and the providers of such              

facilities may be unable to anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate preventive             

measures. Any such security breaches or damages which occur which impact upon the             

Company’s infrastructure network and/or the Privatix platform may adversely impact the utility,            

liquidity, and/or trading price of the PRIX Tokens. 

General global market and economic conditions may have an adverse impact on Privatix Token              

Limited operating performance, results of operations and cash flows 

Privatix Token Limited has been and could continue to be affected by general global economic               

and market conditions. Challenging economic conditions worldwide have from time to time,            

contributed, and may continue to contribute, to slowdowns in the information technology            

industry at large. Weakness in the economy could have a negative effect on the Company’s               

business, operations and financial condition, including decreases in revenue and operating cash            

flows, and inability to attract future equity and/or debt financing on commercially reasonable             

terms. Additionally, in a down-cycle economic environment, Privatix Token Limited may           

experience the negative effects of a slowdown in trading and usage of the Privatix platform.               

Suppliers on which Privatix Token Limited relies for servers, bandwidth, location and other             

services could also be negatively impacted by economic conditions that, in turn, could have a               

negative impact on the Company’s operations or expenses. There can be no assurance, therefore,              

that current economic conditions or worsening economic conditions or a prolonged or recurring             

recession will not have a significant adverse impact on Privatix Token Limited’s business,             

financial condition and results of operations and hence the Privatix platform. Any such             

75 



 

circumstances would then correspondingly negatively impact the utility, liquidity, and/or trading           

price of the PRIX Tokens. 

The Company or the PRIX Tokens may be affected by newly implemented regulations  

Cryptocurrency trading and token sales are generally unregulated worldwide, but numerous           

regulatory authorities across jurisdictions have been outspoken about considering the          

implementation of regulatory regimes which govern cryptocurrency or cryptocurrency markets.          

The Company or the PRIX Tokens may be affected by newly implemented regulations relating              

to cryptocurrencies or cryptocurrency markets, including having to take measures to comply with             

such regulations, or having to deal with queries, notices, requests or enforcement actions by              

regulatory authorities, which may come at a substantial cost and may also require substantial              

modifications to the Privatix platform. This may impact the appeal of the Privatix platform for               

users and result in decreased usage of the Privatix platform and the PRIX Tokens. Further,               

should the costs (financial or otherwise) of complying with such newly implemented regulations             

exceed a certain threshold, maintaining the Privatix platform may no longer be commercially             

viable and the Company may opt to discontinue the Privatix platform and/or the PRIX Tokens.               

Further, it is difficult to predict how or whether governments or regulatory authorities may              

implement any changes to laws and regulations affecting distributed ledger technology and its             

applications, including the Privatix platform and the PRIX Tokens. Privatix Token Limited may             

also have to cease operations in a jurisdiction that makes it illegal to operate in such jurisdiction,                 

or make it commercially unviable or undesirable to obtain the necessary regulatory approval(s)             

or license(s) to operate in such jurisdiction. In scenarios such as the foregoing, the utility,               

liquidating, and/or trading price of PRIX Tokens will be adversely affected or PRIX Tokens may               

cease to be traded. 

There may be unanticipated risks arising from the PRIX Tokens  

Cryptographic tokens such as the PRIX Tokens are a relatively new and dynamic technology. In               

addition to the risks included in the above discussion of Risk Factors, there are other risks                

associated with your purchase, holding and use of the PRIX Tokens, including those that Privatix               

Token Limited cannot anticipate. Such risks may further appear as unanticipated variations or             

combinations of the risks discussed above. 

76 


